Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 5. Display of Number Plates

§ 511.
Manner of display.

Number plates. A motor vehicle operated on any highway shall have displayed in a conspicuous place either one or two number plates as the Commissioner may require. Such number plates shall be furnished by the Commissioner and shall show the number assigned to such vehicle by the Commissioner. If only one number plate is furnished, the same shall be securely attached to the rear of the vehicle. If two are furnished, one shall be securely attached to the rear and one to the front of the vehicle. The number plates shall be kept entirely unobscured, and the numerals and letters thereon shall be plainly legible at all times. They shall be kept horizontal, shall be so fastened as not to swing, excepting, however, there may be installed on a motor truck or truck tractor a device that would, upon contact with a substantial object, permit the rear number plate to swing toward the front of the vehicle, provided such device automatically returns the number plate to its original rigid position after contact is released, and the ground clearance of the lower edges thereof shall be established by the Commissioner pursuant to the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.

Validation sticker. A registration validation sticker shall be unobstructed and shall be affixed as follows:

for vehicles issued registration plates with dimensions of approximately 12 x 6 inches, in the lower right corner of the rear registration plate; and

for vehicles issued a registration plate with a dimension of approximately 7 x 4 inches, in the upper right corner of the rear registration plate.

Violation. A person shall not operate a motor vehicle unless number plates and a validation sticker are displayed as provided in this section.

Failure to display a validation sticker. An operator cited for violating subsection (c) of this section with respect to failure to display a validation sticker on a pleasure car, motorcycle, or truck that could be registered for less than 26,001 pounds shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $5.00, which penalty shall be exempt from surcharges under

13 V.S.A. § 7282(a)

, if he or she is cited within the 14 days following the expiration of the motor vehicle’s registration.

Temporary and in-transit registration plates. A motor vehicle issued a temporary or in-transit registration plate under sections 312, 458, 463, and 516-518 of this title operated on any highway shall have the temporary or in-transit registration plate displayed horizontally in a conspicuous place on the rear of the vehicle, including in the rear window. The temporary or in-transit registration plate shall be kept entirely unobscured, and the numerals and letters thereon shall be plainly legible at all times.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 125

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 15, 1980;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2019, No. 60

, § 32;

2021, No. 76

, § 1, eff. Sept. 8, 2020.

§ 512.
Trailer or semi-trailer.

When a trailer or semi-trailer is being drawn by a registered motor vehicle, the rear number plate assigned to such trailer or semi-trailer shall be displayed on the rear of such trailer or semi-trailer and shall be illuminated at night as provided in section 1248 of this title for the lighting of rear number plates on motor vehicles.

HISTORY:

Amended

2015, No. 47

, § 14.

§ 513.
Misuse of plates.

Except as provided in section 321 of this title, an owner of a motor vehicle shall not attach or cause to be attached to the vehicle number plates that were not assigned by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. A person shall not operate a motor vehicle, except as provided in section 321 of this title, to which number plates are attached that were not assigned to the vehicle by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. An inspector of motor vehicles and any enforcement officer shall have authority to remove from a motor vehicle any plates that have been attached in violation of the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

2005, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 20, 2006.

§ 514.
Replacement number plates.

In case of the loss of a number plate, the owner of the motor vehicle to which it was assigned shall immediately notify the Commissioner of such loss, and the Commissioner shall furnish such owner with a new plate. The fee charged shall be $12.00 for each plate. The owner of a motor vehicle who has lost one number plate may operate his or her vehicle with only one number plate attached, until a new plate is furnished him or her, provided he or she notified the Commissioner as required under this section.

Any replacement number plate shall be issued at a fee of $12.00. However, if the Commissioner, in his or her discretion, determines that a plate has become illegible as a result of deficiencies in the manufacturing process or by use of faulty materials, the replacement fee shall be waived.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1981, No. 81

, § 1, eff. May 5, 1981;

1989, No. 51

, § 33;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. May 15, 2002;

2005, No. 72

, § 12;

2011, No. 46

, § 4;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 155.

§ 515.
Repealed.
1989, No. 137 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§§ 515a-515c.
Repealed. 2015, No. 47, § 15.

§ 516.
Sale of vehicle to go out of State by a person other than dealer.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles is authorized to issue an in-transit registration permit for the purpose of movement over the highways of certain motor vehicles otherwise required to be registered when the vehicles are sold in this State by a person, other than a registered motor vehicle dealer, to be transported to and registered in another state or province. The registration may be obtained by submitting an application on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. The Commissioner is authorized to charge a fee of $6.00 for the processing of the application and the issuance of the plate. The in-transit registration plate pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of 30 days from issuance and shall be in the form and design prescribed by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. Issuance of an in-transit plate for vehicles sold by a registered motor vehicle dealer to a person to be transported to and registered in another state or province shall be governed by the provisions of section 463 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 30

, § 2, eff. April 17, 1979; amended

1985, No. 30

, § 3;

1995, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 35

, § 2;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 517.
Intrastate in-transit permit.

The Commissioner may issue an intrastate in-transit registration permit to authorize the movement within Vermont of a motor vehicle otherwise required to be registered, if the vehicle is sold in this State by a person other than a registered motor vehicle dealer. The permit may be obtained after submission of an application on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner and payment of a $6.00 fee. The permit shall be valid for a period of 10 days from the date of issuance and shall be in the form and design prescribed by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 33.

§ 518.
Electronic issuance of temporary plate and temporary registration.

Issuance of plate and registration; length. The Commissioner is authorized to electronically issue a temporary plate and temporary registration to be printed by the owner of a motor vehicle for the purpose of movement over the highways of certain motor vehicles otherwise required to be registered when the vehicles are sold by a person other than a registered motor vehicle dealer. The temporary plate and temporary registration issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of 60 days from issuance and shall be in the form and design prescribed by the Commissioner.

Form of application; fee. The temporary plate and temporary registration may be obtained by submitting an application under oath on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner, which shall require the applicant to attest to compliance with the provisions of section 800 of this title and provide any other proof of the identity of the vehicle the Commissioner reasonably requires. The Commissioner is authorized to charge a fee of $6.00 for the processing of the application and the issuance of the temporary plate and temporary registration.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2021, No. 76

, § 2, eff. Sept. 8, 2020.